test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kudo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - кудо: # Ordinary nouns - full paradigm including MWN
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: кудо
    кудо+N+SP+Gen+Indef: кудонь
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+Indef: кудодо
    кудо+N+SP+DatCx+Indef: кудонень
    кудо+N+SP+Com+Indef: кудонек
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+Indef: кудовтомо
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+Indef: кудошка
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+Indef: кудосо
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+Indef: кудосто
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+Indef: кудос
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+Indef: кудова
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+Indef: кудокс
# This does not exist    кудо+N+SP+Lat+Indef: кудов
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кудом
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: кудон
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [кудом, кудон]
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: кудон
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: кудодон
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: кудовтомон
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg1: кудошкан
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: кудосон
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: кудостон
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: кудозон
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: кудован
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxSg1: кудоксон
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кудот
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: кудот
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кудот
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: кудот
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: кудодот
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: кудовтомот
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg2: кудошкат
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: кудосот
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: кудостот
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: кудозот
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: кудоват
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2: кудоксот
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кудозо
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: кудонзо
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: кудонзо
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: кудонзо
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: кудодонзо
    кудо+N+SP+DatCx+PxSg3: кудонстэнь
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: кудовтомонзо
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg3: кудошканзо
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: кудосонзо
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: кудостонзо
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: кудозонзо
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: кудованзо
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxSg3: кудоксонзо
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: кудонок
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: кудонок
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: кудонок
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: кудонок
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: кудодонок
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: кудовтомонок
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl1: кудошканок
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: кудосонок
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: кудостонок
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: кудозонок
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: кудованок
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxPl1: кудоксонок
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: кудонк
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: кудонк
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: кудонк
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: кудонк
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: кудодонк
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: кудовтомонк
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl2: кудошканк
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: кудосонк
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: кудостонк
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: кудозонк
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: кудованк
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxPl2: кудоксонк
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: кудост
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: кудост
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: кудост
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: кудост
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: кудодост
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: кудовтомост
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl3: кудошкаст
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: кудосост
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: кудостост
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: кудозост
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: кудоваст
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxPl3: кудоксост
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: кудот
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: кудон
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: кудонзо
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+Def: кудось
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+Def: кудонть
    кудо+N+Sg+DatCx+Def: кудонтень
    кудо+N+Sg+Abl+Def: кудодонть
    кудо+N+Sg+Ine+Def: кудосонть
    кудо+N+Sg+Ela+Def: кудостонть
    кудо+N+Sg+Prl+Def: кудованть
    кудо+N+Sg+Abe+Def: кудовтомонть
    кудо+N+Sg+CompCx+Def: кудошканть
    кудо+N+Sg+Tra+Def: кудоксонть
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+Def: кудотне
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+Def: кудотнень
    кудо+N+Pl+DatCx+Def: кудотненень
    кудо+N+Pl+Abl+Def: кудотнеде
    кудо+N+Pl+Ine+Def: кудотнесэ
    кудо+N+Pl+Ela+Def: кудотнестэ
    кудо+N+Pl+Ill+Def: кудотнес
    кудо+N+Pl+Prl+Def: кудотнева
    кудо+N+Pl+Tra+Def: кудотнекс
    кудо+N+Pl+Abe+Def: кудотневтеме
    кудо+N+Pl+CompCx+Def: кудотнешка
    кудо+N+Pl+Com+Def: кудотненек
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудояк
    кудо+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудоньгак
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудодояк
    кудо+N+SP+DatCx+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудоненьгак
    кудо+N+SP+Com+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудонеккак
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудовтомояк
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудошкаяк
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудосояк
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудостояк
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудоскак
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудоваяк
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудокскак
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудомгак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудонгак
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: [кудомгак, кудонгак]
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудонгак
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудодонгак
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудовтомонгак
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудошкангак
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудосонгак
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудостонгак
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудозонгак
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудовангак
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудоксонгак
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудоткак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудоткак
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудоткак
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудоткак
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудодоткак
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудовтомоткак
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудошкаткак
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудосоткак
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудостоткак
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудозоткак
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудоваткак
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2+Foc/Гак: кудоксоткак
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудозояк
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудонзояк
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудонзояк
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудонзояк
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудодонзояк
    кудо+N+SP+DatCx+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудонстэньгак
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудовтомонзояк
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудошканзояк
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудосонзояк
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудостонзояк
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудозонзояк
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудованзояк
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудоксонзояк
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудоноккак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудоноккак
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудоноккак
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудоноккак
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудодоноккак
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудовтомоноккак
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудошканоккак
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудосоноккак
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудостоноккак
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудозоноккак
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудованоккак
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxPl1+Foc/Гак: кудоксоноккак
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудонккак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудонккак
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудонккак
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудонккак
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудодонккак
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудовтомонккак
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудошканккак
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудосонккак
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудостонккак
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудозонккак
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудованккак
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxPl2+Foc/Гак: кудоксонккак
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудосткак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудосткак
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудосткак
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудосткак
    кудо+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудодосткак
    кудо+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудовтомосткак
    кудо+N+SP+CompCx+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудошкасткак
    кудо+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудососткак
    кудо+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудостосткак
    кудо+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудозосткак
    кудо+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудовасткак
    кудо+N+SP+Tra+PxPl3+Foc/Гак: кудоксосткак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/Гак: кудоткак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Гак: кудонгак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Гак: кудонзояк
    кудо+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/Гак: кудоськак
    кудо+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/Гак: кудонтькак
    кудо+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Foc/Гак: кудонтеньгак
    кудо+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Foc/Гак: кудодонтькак
    кудо+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Foc/Гак: кудосонтькак
    кудо+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Foc/Гак: кудостонтькак
    кудо+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Foc/Гак: кудовантькак
    кудо+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Foc/Гак: кудовтомонтькак
    кудо+N+Sg+CompCx+Def+Foc/Гак: кудошкантькак
    кудо+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Foc/Гак: кудоксонтькак
    кудо+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнеяк
    кудо+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотненьгак
    кудо+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнененьгак
    кудо+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнедеяк
    кудо+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнесэяк
    кудо+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнестэяк
    кудо+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнескак
    кудо+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотневаяк
    кудо+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнекскак
    кудо+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотневтемеяк
    кудо+N+Pl+CompCx+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотнешкаяк
    кудо+N+Pl+Com+Def+Foc/Гак: кудотненеккак
